Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1001
Public policy; sites; acquisition; conveyance to state; construction of buildings.

The Legislature hereby declares the public policy of the State of Nebraska to be that the acquisition of real estate sites for the construction of state armories within the corporate limits of cities or villages for the uses and purposes of the Nebraska National Guard and State Guard is a matter of general state concern and that the use of said sites is a state use and not a city, village or local use. One of the corporate purposes of all cities and villages is hereby declared to be to acquire real estate sites within their corporate limits and to convey the same without consideration to the State of Nebraska for the uses and purposes of the Nebraska National Guard and State Guard, as provided in sections 18-1002 to 18-1005. Notwithstanding any more general or special law respecting armories in force and effect in this state, the local governing bodies of cities or villages therein are hereby empowered by ordinance to acquire through the exercise of the right of eminent domain, or otherwise, real estate to be used as a site or sites for the construction of state armories to be devoted to the uses and purposes of the Nebraska National Guard and State Guard and to convey such real estate without consideration, when acquired, to the State of Nebraska to the end that through state aid or federal aid, or both, state armory buildings may be constructed thereon without cost to such cities or villages other than the cost to said cities or villages of said real estate so acquired and conveyed.

Laws 1935, Spec. Sess., c. 10, § 1, p. 69;

Laws 1941, c. 130, § 7, p. 491;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 18-1801;

R.S.1943, § 18-1001.